Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1217
Bridges; acquisition; revenue bonds; power to issue.

A city of the metropolitan class is authorized to provide funds for the purposes of sections 14-1201 to 14-1252 by the issuance of revenue bonds of such city, the principal and interest of which bonds shall be payable solely from the special funds provided in such sections for such payment and as to which, as shall be recited in such bonds, the city shall incur no indebtedness of any kind or nature and to support which the city shall not pledge its credit nor its taxing power nor any part of such credit or taxing power. Such bonds may, at the option of the city council, be supported by mortgage or by deed of trust.

Laws 1929, c. 176, § 10, p. 619;

C.S.1929, § 14-1210;

Laws 1931, c. 27, § 2, p. 108;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 14-1210;

R.S.1943, § 14-1217;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 250.
July 21, 2022